District of Columbia statutes.
19-306

Children to share equally.

When the intestate leaves children and no other descendants, the surplus is divided equally among them.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-306.
1973 Ed., § 19-306.